Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-402
Council; president; acting president; duties.

The council shall elect one of the council members as president of the council and he or she shall preside at all meetings of the council in the absence of the mayor. In the absence of the president, the council members shall elect one of their own body to occupy the place temporarily, who shall be styled acting president of the council. The president and acting president, when occupying the place of mayor, shall have the same privileges as other members of the council, and all acts of the president or acting president while so acting shall be as binding upon the council and upon the city as if done by the mayor.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 53, p. 259;

R.S.1913, § 4895;

C.S.1922, § 4063;

C.S.1929, § 16-402;

R.S.1943, § 16-402;

Laws 1987, LB 652, § 2.